motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
accarpionando/D
accartocciato/FT
acceduto/GT
accingendo/E
accozzando/D
accreditato/FTJ
addivenuto/GT
adendo/E
affaticando/D
affatturato/FTUqrs
affienire/CTXqrI
affievolito/HTUqrs
affluire/CTXqrI
aggobbito/HTUqrs
aggrinzendo/E
aggrinzire/CTXqrI
agguagliando/D
agguerrito/HTUYqrs
agitato/FTYUqrs
allestire/CTXqrI
allocchito/HTUqrs
amando/D
ammalizzire/CTXqrI
ammansito/HTUqrs
ammollire/CTXqrI
ammorbidito/HTUqrs
ammortendo/E
ammoscire/CTXqrI
ammutolito/HTUqrs
animando/D
annebbiato/FTUqrs
apparire/JCTXqrI
appartenuto/GTUqrs
applaudendo/E
applaudito/HTUqrs
appoderando/D
appratire/CTXqrI
ardire/CTXqrI
ardito/HTUYqrs
arringando/D
arrogato/FTUqrs
arrossire/CTXqrI
arrossito/HTUqrs
arruvidendo/E
assalire/CTXqrI
assalito/HTUqrs
assopire/CTXqrI
assopito/HTUqrs
assordando/D
assumendo/E
astringere/BTXqrI
attecchire/CTXqrI
attecchito/HTUqrs
attenuto/GTUqrs
attutire/CTXqrI
attutito/HTUqrs
autogestendo/E
autolimitando/D
automaticizzato/F
avvalere/BTXI
avveduto/GTYUqrs
avvilito/HTUqrs
avvizzire/CTXqrI
bandito/H
barrire/CI
battuto/G
benedicendo/E
bestemmiando/D
bevuto/G
biancheggiato/F
blandito/H
bollire/CI
caduto/G
calatafando/D
calcinato/F
candito/H
capire/CI
chiarendo/E
cingere/BI
circondando/D
circonvenuto/G
circostanziato/FY
colpito/H
combattendo/E
commettere/BI
comparire/JCI
compiaciuto/G
compravenduto/G
comprimere/BI
concludendo/E
configgere/BI
confluire/CI
confluito/H
coniato/F
connumerando/D
conosciuto/GeJ
consistendo/E
contraddistinguere/BI
contravvenuto/G
contribuito/H
convenuto/G
convertire/CI
convincendo/E
corrodere/BI
creduto/G
crocifiggendo/E
dattilografato/F
decadere/BI
decaduto/G
decapottando/D
decresciuto/G
deludendo/E
deludere/BI
deperito/H
deprezzato/F
deselezionando/D
detergere/BI
devoluto/G
diffrangendo/E
dipingere/BI
disconoscendo/E
disconosciuto/G
discorrere/BI
disegnato/F
disinnamorando/D
disinvestire/CI
distinguere/BI
divenuto/G
divertito/H
dolendo/E
eccellere/BTqrI
effettuato/FTUqrs
emulando/D
ergere/BTXqrI
eseguire/CTXqrI
espellere/BTXqrI
esponendo/E
estrudere/BTXqrI
eviscerato/FTUqrs
evoluto/GYT
filmando/D
fondere/BI
freddato/F
fuggendo/E
fuggire/CI
fuggito/H
genuflettere/BI
gettando/D
gioire/CI
goduto/G
graticolato/F
imbibendo/E
imbirbonito/HTUqrs
imbolsire/CTXqrI
imbrigliando/D
immergere/BJTXI
impasticcato/FTUqrs
impidocchito/HTUqrs
impreziosendo/E
inadempiuto/GTUqrs
inasinire/CTXqrI
incanalando/D
incarbonchire/CTXqrI
incarnito/HTUqrs
incartapecorire/CTXqrI
incatramato/FTUqrs
incorrere/BTXqrI
incuocendo/E
incustodito/HTUqrs
infialettando/D
influire/CTXqrI
inforcato/FTUqrs
inforestierendo/E
infrangere/BTXqrI
inghiottito/H
insignorendo/E
intasando/D
intercorrere/BTXqrI
interfacciato/FTUqrs
interferito/HTUqrs
interloquire/CTXqrI
intorbidendo/E
intrattenuto/GTUqrs
intravvedere/BTXI
involvendo/E
iposolfito/HTUqrs
irridere/BTXqrI
irrisoluto/GTUqrs
lambiccando/D
lardato/F
massimando/D
masturbato/F
mettere/BI
mietuto/G
misconoscendo/E
morire/CI
mugugnando/D
mugugnato/F
nascondere/BI
nitrito/H
ossificato/FTUqrs
osteggiando/D
ottenuto/GTJ
ottundere/BTXqrI
pendo/E
percentualizzato/F
perforando/D
permettere/BI
pervenuto/G
pervertire/CI
plaudito/H
porgere/BJI
potuto/G
preaccennato/F
precisando/D
prediligendo/E
premere/BI
prevalere/BI
prevenduto/G
promuovendo/E
proseguire/CI
proteggere/BI
provenuto/G
puzzato/F
querelando/D
radioassistito/H
rapprendendo/E
rasentato/F
rastremando/D
recidere/BI
respingendo/E
retrovenduto/G
riaccogliere/BI
riacutizzato/F
riaffogliando/D
ribattuto/G
ricommettendo/E
ricommettere/BI
riconvenuto/G
riconvertire/CI
riconvertito/H
rideterminato/F
ridoluto/G
ridottando/D
rieleggere/BI
riesplodendo/E
rimpettito/H
rimpigrire/CI
rimpoverendo/E
rimutato/F
rinchiudere/BI
rincorando/D
rintorbidendo/E
rinvilito/H
ripetuto/GY
riscoprire/CI
risoffiato/F
risolvendo/E
risorgere/BI
risovvenuto/G
risquadrando/D
riuscito/H
riveduto/G
rodere/BI
ruggendo/E
sanato/F
saputo/GY
satinando/D
sbollire/CI
scampanato/F
scapecchiando/D
scaturito/H
scommettendo/E
scompattato/F
sconsolando/D
scorrere/BJI
seduto/G
sfaldato/F
sfiancando/D
sfiorito/H
sfuggendo/E
sfuggire/CI
sincopato/FY
slegando/D
soggiungere/BI
sonnecchiato/F
soprascrivendo/E
soprasseduto/G
soprelevando/D
sostenuto/GJ
sottacere/BI
sovvenendo/E
sovvertire/CI
sovvertito/H
spettacolarizzato/F
spiaciuto/G
spiemontizzando/D
splendere/BI
spoltronire/CI
squittito/H
stanato/F
stereotipando/D
stiepidire/CI
stingendo/E
stizzito/H
strabevuto/G
stranire/CI
sturato/F
subito/HY
suddistinguere/BI
suggestionando/D
sussumendo/E
svanire/CI
sveltito/H
taciuto/G
tartassato/F
teletrasportando/D
tergere/BI
tessuto/G
tornire/CI
traendo/E
tralasciato/F
tramortito/H
trasecolando/D
travestire/CI
travolgere/BI
udito/HTUqrs
umiliato/FTUqrs
valendo/E
vanvereggiando/D
venduto/G
vestire/CI
xerocopiato/F
